test/src/morphology/N-seer_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - sēr: # Noun 223 'eng /est säär/fin' - full paradigm
     sēr+N+Sg+Nom: sēr
     sēr+N+Sg+Gen: sǟr
     sēr+N+Sg+Par: sǟrtõ
     sēr+N+Sg+Dat: sǟrõn
     sēr+N+Sg+Ins: sǟrkõks
     sēr+N+Sg+Ill: sǟrõ
     sēr+N+Sg+Ela: sǟrstõ
     sēr+N+Pl+Nom: sǟrd
     sēr+N+Pl+Gen: sǟrd
     sēr+N+Pl+Par: sēŗi
     sēr+N+Pl+Dat: sǟrdõn
     sēr+N+Pl+Ins: sǟrdkõks
     sēr+N+Pl+Ill: sēŗiž
     sēr+N+Pl+Ela: sēŗšti
